Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Common Interest Communities

§ 2-101.
Creation of common interest communities.

A common interest community may be created pursuant to this title only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed. The declaration shall be recorded in each town in which any portion of the common interest community is located and shall be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the common interest community and the association and in the grantor’s index in the name of each person executing the declaration.

In a condominium, a declaration or an amendment to a declaration to add units may not be recorded unless all structural components and mechanical systems of all building containing or comprising any units created by the declaration are substantially completed in accordance with the plans as evidenced by a recorded certificate of completion executed by an independent professional engineer, surveyor or architect, as appropriate and if authorized by the respective practice acts of each profession in 26 V.S.A. chapters 3, 20, and 45.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 35.

§ 2-102.
Unit boundaries.

Except as provided by the declaration in a common interest community:

if walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, all wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, finished flooring, and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces of the unit are part of the unit, and all other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are part of the common elements;

if any chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or any other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated boundaries of a unit, any portion of it serving only that unit is a limited common element allocated solely to that unit, and any portion of it serving more than one unit or any portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements;

subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this section, all spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are part of the unit;

any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, patios, and all exterior doors and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single unit but located outside the unit’s boundaries are limited common elements allocated exclusively to that unit.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

It is important for title purposes, for purposes of defining maintenance responsibilities, and for other reasons to have a clear guide as to which parts of a common interest community constitute the units and which parts constitute common elements. This section fills the gap left when the declaration merely defines unit boundaries in terms of floors, ceilings, and perimetric walls, and is particularly useful in the case of cooperatives, in which the recording of plats and plans is not required. See Section 2-105(a)(5).

The differentiations made clear here, in conjunction with the provisions of Section 3-107, will assist in minimizing disputes which have historically arisen in association administration with respect to liability for repair of such things as pipes, porches, and other components of a building which unit owners may expect the association to pay for and which the association may wish to have repaired by unit owners. Problems which may arise as a result of negligence in the use of components—such as stoops and pipes—are resolved by Section 3-107, which imposes liability on a unit owner who causes damage to common elements, or under the broader provisions of Section 3-115(c), which permits the association to assess common expenses “caused by the misconduct of any unit owner” exclusively against that person. This would include, of course, not only damages to common elements, but fines or unusual service fees, such as clean-up costs, incurred as a result of the unit owner’s misuse of the common elements.

The differentiation between components constituting common elements and components which are part of the unit is particularly important in light of Section 3-107(a), which (subject to the exceptions therein mentioned) makes the association responsible for upkeep of common elements and each unit owner individually responsible for upkeep of his unit.

The differentiation between unit components and common element components may or may not be important for insurance purposes under the Act. While the common elements in a project must always be insured, the units themselves need not be insured by the Association unless the project contains units divided by horizontal boundaries. See Section 3-113(a) and (b). In a “high-rise” configuration, however, Section 3-113(a) contemplates that both will normally be insured by the association (exclusive of improvements and betterments in individual units) and that the cost of such insurance will be a common expense. That common expense may be allocated, however, on the basis of risk if the declaration so requires. See Section 3-115(c)(3).

The provisions of this section may be varied, of course, to the extent that the declarant wishes to modify the details for a particular common interest community.

For example, in a townhouse project structured as a condominium or planned community, it may be desirable that the unit boundaries constitute the exterior surfaces of the roof and exterior walls, with the center line of the party walls constituting the perimetric boundaries of the units in that plane, and the undersurface of the bottom slab dividing the unit itself from the underlying land.
Alternately, the boundaries of the units at the party walls might be extended to include actual division of underlying land itself.
In those cases it would be inappropriate for walls, floors, and ceilings to be designated as boundaries, and the declaration would describe the boundaries in the above manner.

§ 2-103.
Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

All provisions of the declaration and bylaws are severable.

The rule against perpetuities may not be applied to defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, or rules adopted pursuant to this title.

If a conflict exists between the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails except to the extent the declaration is inconsistent with this title.

Title to a unit is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with this title. Whether a substantial failure impairs marketability is not affected by this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 2-104.
Description of units.

A description of a unit which sets forth the name of the common interest community, the volume and page in which the declaration is recorded, the town in which the common interest community is located, and the identifying number of the unit is a legally sufficient description of that unit and all rights, obligations and interests appurtenant to that unit which were created by the declaration or bylaws.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The intent of this section is that no description of a unit in a deed, lease, deed of trust, mortgage, or any other instrument or document shall be subject to challenge for failure to meet any common law or other requirements, so long as the requirements of this section are satisfied, and so long as the declaration itself, together with the plats and plans which are a part of the declaration, provides a legally sufficient description.

The last sentence makes clear that an instrument which does meet those requirements includes all interests appurtenant to the unit. As a result, it will not be necessary under this Act to continue the practice, common in some jurisdictions, of describing in the instrument conveying title to a unit the common element interests, or limited common elements, that are appurtenant to that unit or make reference to surveys or subsequent amendments to declarations.

§ 2-105.
Contents of declaration for a common interest community.

The declaration shall contain all the following:

The names of the common interest community and the association and a statement that the common interest community is either a condominium or planned community.

The name of each municipality in which any part of the common interest community is located.

A legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the common interest community.

A statement of the maximum number of units which the declarant reserves the right to create.

A description of the boundaries of each unit created by the declaration, including the identifying number of the unit.

A description of any limited common elements other than those specified in subdivisions 2-102(2) and (4) of this title as provided in subdivision 2-109(b)(10) of this title and, in a planned community, any real estate which is or will be common elements.

A description of any real estate, except real estate subject to development rights, which may be subsequently allocated as limited common elements, other than those specified in subdivisions 2-102(2) and (4) of this title and a statement that they may be so allocated.

A description of any declarant rights required by subdivision 1-103(14) of this title and other special declarant rights required by subdivision 1-103(28) of this title reserved by the declarant, and a legally sufficient description of the real estate to which each of those rights applies and a time limit within which each right shall be exercised.

A statement of any development rights which may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate at different times, and:

either a statement fixing the boundaries of those portions and regulating the order in which those portions may be subjected to each development right or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard; and

a statement as to whether, if any development right is exercised in any portion of the real estate subject to that development right, that development right must be exercised in all or in any other portion of that real estate.

Any other conditions or limitations on the rights described in subdivision (8) of this subsection.

An allocation to each unit of the allocated interests pursuant to section 2-107 of this title.

Any restrictions:

on alienation of the units, including any restrictions on leasing which exceed the restrictions on leasing units which executive boards may impose pursuant to subdivision 3-102(c)(2) of this title; and

on the amount for which a unit may be sold or on the amount that may be received by a unit owner on sale, condemnation or casualty loss to the unit or to the common interest community, or on termination of the common interest community.

The volume and page of recorded easements and licenses appurtenant to or included in the common interest community or to which any portion of the common interest community is or may be subject by a reservation in the declaration.

All matters required by sections 2-106, 2-107, 2-108, 2-109, 2-110, 2-111, 2-112, 2-113, 2-114, 2-116, and 3-103(d) of this title.

Any authorization pursuant to which the association may establish and enforce construction and design criteria and aesthetic standards as provided in sections 3-103 and 3-106 of this title.

The declaration may contain any other matters which the declarant deems appropriate, including any restrictions on the uses of a unit or the number or other qualifications of persons who may occupy units.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 2-106.
Leasehold common interest communities.

Any lease the expiration or termination of which may terminate the common interest community or reduce its size shall be recorded. Every lessor of those leases in a condominium or planned community shall sign the declaration. The declaration shall state all the following:

The volume and page in which the lease is recorded or a statement of where the complete lease may be inspected.

The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire.

A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease.

Any right of the unit owners to redeem the reversion and the manner in which those rights may be exercised, or a statement that the owners do not have those rights.

Any right of the unit owners to remove any improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease, or a statement that the owners do not have those rights.

Any rights of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of any renewal, or a statement that the owners do not have those rights.

After the declaration for a leasehold condominium or leasehold planned community is recorded, neither the lessor nor the lessor’s successor in interest may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit owner who makes timely payment of his or her share of the rent and otherwise complies with all covenants which if violated would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. A unit owner’s leasehold interest in a condominium or planned community is not affected by failure of any other person to pay rent or fulfill any other covenant.

Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any unit owner by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and reversionary or remainder interests unless the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a common interest community, the allocated interests shall be reallocated proportionately in accordance with section 1-107 of this title. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed and recorded by the association.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) requires that the lessor of any lease in a condominium or planned community which, upon termination, will terminate the condominium or planned community or reduce its size, must sign the declaration. This requirement insures that the lessor has consented to use of his land as a condominium or planned community. Note that such a signature is not required in the case of a lease in a cooperative. This distinction between the types of common interest communities tracks that made by UCA, UPCA, and MRECA.

Subsection (a)(1) provides alternative bracketed language which should be considered by each State based on its practice. In any State where the recording acts do not specify the essential terms which must be included in a memorandum of lease, either this section should be supplemented to specify the essential terms, or the bracketed language relating to such memoranda should be deleted.

This section sets out requirements concerning leasehold common interest communities which are not typically contained in the laws of most States. In particular, it requires that the declaration describe the rights of the unit owners, or state that they have no rights concerning a variety of significant matters. This section also contains a number of other consumer protection provisions. However, in contrast to the result under some States’ condominium laws, neither the unit owners nor the association have a statutory right to renewal of a lease upon termination.

In the case of leasehold condominiums and planned communities, the most significant matter of consumer protection in this section is subsection (b), which provides that unit owners who pay their share of the rent of the underlying lease may not be deprived of their enjoyment of the leasehold premises.

Subsection (d) considers the problems created when termination of a lease reduces the size of a common interest community. In the event that some units are thereby withdrawn from the common interest community, reallocation of the allocated interests would be required; the section describes how that reallocation would occur.

Subsection (b) is intended to protect the leasehold condominium or planned community “unit owner” regardless of whether he is a lessee, sublessee, or even further down in a chain of transfer of leasehold interests.
See Section 1-103(32).
Thus, for example, if the “unit owner” is a sublessee, the term “lessor (or) his successor in interest” includes not only the lessor, but also the lessee.

Subsection (b) further protects the unit owner by assuring that he will not share with his fellow unit owners any collective obligations toward their common lessor.
All obligations are instead fractionalized so that no unit owner can be made liable or otherwise penalized for a default by any of his fellows.
Thus, a default by the association in payment of the rent due to a lessor, in a case where the lease of common elements ran to the association, would not permit the lessor to terminate continued use of those common elements by those unit owners who then pay their share of the rent.

Subsection (b) does not address the issue of whether a unit owner’s tenant may cure a default by the unit owner under the unit owner’s lease so as to prevent termination of the unit owner’s lease.

Example:
Assume that A leases 100 acres of land to B for 50 years.
B, in turn, leases the same 100 acres to C, for the duration of the 50 year term.
C creates a condominium on the leasehold land, and thereby becomes the declarant; thereafter, he leases a unit in the condominium to D, together with a lease of this allocated undivided interest in the leasehold underlying the unit, for the duration of the 50 year term.
D then leases his unit to E for a term of five years.

Both A and B must execute the declaration; see Section 2-106(a).
So long as D meets his obligations to C—or any other persons—under the declaration and his sublease, D’s interest in the leasehold may not be terminated by either A, B, or C; see Section 2-106.
For that reason, A and B will likely take appropriate steps to protect their interests in the event that D makes timely payment to C, if called for in the declaration or lease, but C fails to meet his obligations to either A or B.
If D fails to make timely payment to C—or to B or A if those persons have so required—then D’s interest may be terminated by the person entitled to payment, unless E is entitled to cure.
E may cure and thereby prevent default, however, only if other law of the State permits transferees of partial interests to cure defaults of his transferor.
Since E is not a unit owner, he is not entitled to rights under this Act.

However, this section does not permit a unit owner in a cooperative to preserve his interest in the cooperative by paying his pro-rata share of the rent in the event the association fails to pay rent due under a ground lease.
This distinction flows from the differences in the nature of a cooperative and a condominium or a planned community, and it tracks the distinction made by UCA and UPCA, and MRECA.

§ 2-107.
Allocation of allocated interests.

The declaration shall allocate to each unit:

In a condominium, a fraction or percentage of undivided interests in the common elements and in the common expenses of the association pursuant to subsection 3-115(a) of this title and a portion of the votes in the association; and

In a planned community, a fraction or percentage of the common expenses of the association pursuant to subsection 3-115(a) of this title and a portion of the votes in the association.

The declaration shall state the formulas used to establish allocations of interests. Those allocations may not discriminate in favor of units owned by the declarant or an affiliate of the declarant.

If units may be added to or withdrawn from the common interest community, the declaration shall state the formulas to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among all units included in the common interest community after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide:

different allocations of votes to the units on particular matters specified in the declaration;

cumulative voting only for the purpose of electing members of the executive board; and

class voting on specified issues affecting the class if necessary to protect valid interests of the class.

A declarant may not utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by this title nor may units constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

Except for minor variations due to rounding, the sum of the common expense liabilities and, in a condominium, the sum of the undivided interests in the common elements allocated at any time to all the units shall each equal one if stated as a fraction or 100 percent if stated as a percentage. In the event of discrepancy between an allocated interest and the result derived from application of the pertinent formula, the allocated interest prevails.

In a condominium, the common elements are not subject to partition, and any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an undivided interest in the common elements made without the unit to which that interest is allocated, is void.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) treats allocated interests differently in each type of common interest community. The distinctions made in parts (i)-(iii) track those made in the corresponding subsection of UCA, UPCA, and MRECA, for condominiums, planned communities, and cooperatives, respectively.

Most existing condominium statutes and cooperative documents require a single common basis, usually related to the “value” of the units, to be used in the allocation of common element interests, or ownership interests in cooperatives, votes in the association and common expense liabilities. Following UCA, UPCA, and MRECA, this Act departs radically from such requirements by permitting each of these allocations to be made on different bases, and by permitting allocations which are unrelated to value.

While the flexibility permitted in allocations is broader than that commonly used today, it is likely that the traditional bases for allocation will continue to be used, and that the allocation for all allocated interests will often be based on the same formulas. Most commonly, those bases include size, equality, or value of units. Each of these is discussed below.

If size is chosen as a basis of allocation, the declarant must choose between reliance on area or volume, and the choice must be indicated in the declaration. The declarant might further refine the formula by, for example, excluding unheated areas from the calculation or by partially discounting such areas by means of a ratio. Again, the declarant must indicate the choices he has made and explain the formula he has chosen.

Most existing condominium statutes require that “value” be used as the basis of all allocations. Under this Act a declarant is free to select such a basis if he wishes to do so. For example, he might designate the “par value” of each unit as a stated number of dollars or points. However, the formula used to develop the par values of the various units would have to be explained in the declaration. For example, the declaration for a high rise project might disclose that the par value of each unit is based on the relative area of each unit on the lower floors, but increases by specified percentages at designated higher levels. The formula for determining area in this example could be further refined in the manner suggested in Comment 4, above, and any other factors (such as the direction in which a unit faces) could also be given weight so long as the weight given to each factor is explained in the declaration.

The purpose of subsection (c) is to require a comprehensive scheme for reallocation of allocated interests in a common interest community subject to development rights, and afford some advance disclosure to purchasers of units in the first phase of an expandable common interest community of how allocated interests will be reallocated if additional units are added.

Subsection (d) represents a significant departure from the practice in most States concerning the allocation of votes. The usual rule is that a single allocation of votes is made to each unit, and that allocation applies to all matters on which those votes may be cast. This section recognizes that the increasingly complex nature of some projects requires different allocations on particular questions. Different allocations may be appropriate, for example, in a project where common expense liabilities, or questions concerning rules and regulations, affect different units differently.

This section recognizes that there may be certain instances in which class voting in the association would be desirable. For example, in a mixed-use planned community or condominium consisting of both residential and commercial units, there may be certain kinds of issues upon which the residential or commercial unit owners should have a special voice, and the device described in Comment 7 is not desired. To prevent abuse of class voting by the declarant, subsection (d) permits class voting only with respect to specified issues directly affecting the designated class and only insofar as necessary to protect valid interests of the designated class.

The last clause of subsection (d) prohibits a practice common in planned communities, where units owned by declarant constitute a separate class of units for voting and other purposes. Upon transfer of title, those units lose these more favorable voting rights. This section makes clear that the votes and other attributes of ownership of a unit may not change by virtue of the identity of the owner. The Act provides other, more balanced, devices for those circumstances which such classes were legitimately intended to address, principally declarant control of the association. See Section 3-103(d).

Thus, a common interest community’s applicable allocations might be made equally among all units, or in proportion to the relative size of each unit, or on the basis of any other formula the declarant may select, regardless of the value of those units.
Moreover, “size” might be used, for example, in allocating common expenses and common element interests (or ownership interest), while equality is used in allocating votes in the association.
This section does not require that the formulas used by the declarant be justified, but it does require that the formulas be explained.
The sole restriction on the formulas to be used in these allocations is that they not discriminate in favor of the units owned by the declarant.
Otherwise, each of the separate allocations may be on any basis which the declarant chooses, and none of the allocations need be tied to any other allocation.

Example:
In a mixed commercial and residential project, the declaration might provide that each unit owner would have an equal vote for the election of the Board of Directors.
However, on matters concerning ratification of the common expense budget, where the commercial unit owners pay a much larger share than their proportion of the total units, the vote of commercial unit owners might be increased so that they exceed the number of votes the residential owners hold. Alternatively, of course, it might be possible to treat this question as a class voting matter, but the draftsman is provided flexibility in this section to choose the most appropriate solution.

Example: Owners of town house units, in a single project consisting of both town house and high-rise buildings, might properly constitute a separate class for purposes of voting on expenditures affecting only the town house units, but they might not be permitted to vote by class on rules for the use of facilities used by all the units.

The subsection further provides that the declarant may not use the class voting device for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by this Act (e.g., to maintain declarant control beyond the period permitted by Section 3-103).

§ 2-108.
Limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in subdivisions 2-102(2) and (4) of this title and except to the extent that a right to allocate a limited common element is reserved pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the declaration shall specify to which unit or units each limited common element is allocated. That allocation may not be altered without the consent of the unit owners whose units are affected.

Except as the declaration otherwise provides, a limited common element may be reallocated by an amendment to the declaration executed by the unit owners between or among whose units the reallocation is made. The persons executing the amendment shall provide a copy thereof to the association, which shall record it. The amendment shall be recorded in the names of the parties and the common interest community.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element may be allocated only pursuant to the declaration made in accordance with subdivision 2-105(a)(7) of this title. The allocations shall be made by amendments to the declaration.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 2-109.
Plats and plans.

Plats and plans are a part of the declaration, and required for condominiums and planned communities. Separate plats and plans are not required by this title if all the information required by this section is contained in either a plat or plan. Each plat and plan shall be clear and legible and contain a certification that the plat or plan contains all information required by this section.

Each plat shall show or project:

the name and a plat or general schematic map of the entire common interest community;

the location and dimensions of all real estate not subject to development rights, or subject only to the development right to withdraw, and the location and dimensions of all existing improvements within that real estate;

a legally sufficient description of any real estate subject to development rights, labeled to identify the rights applicable to each parcel, but plats and plans need not designate or label which development rights are applicable to each parcel if that information is clearly delineated in the declaration;

the extent of any encroachments by or on any portion of the common interest community;

to the extent feasible, a legally sufficient description of all easements serving or burdening any portion of the common interest community;

except as otherwise provided in subsection (h) of this section, the approximate location and dimensions of any vertical unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans recorded pursuant to subsection (d) of this section and that unit’s identifying number;

except as otherwise provided in subsection (h) of this section, the approximate location with reference to an established datum of any horizontal unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans recorded pursuant to subsection (d) of this section and that unit’s identifying number;

a legally sufficient description of any real estate in which the unit owners will own only an estate for years, labeled as “leasehold real estate”;

the distance between noncontiguous parcels of real estate comprising the common interest community;

the approximate location and dimensions of porches, balconies and patios and excluding parking spaces allocated as limited common elements, and show or contain a narrative description of any other limited common elements; and

in the case of real estate not subject to development rights, all other matters customarily shown on land plats.

A plat may also show the intended location and dimensions of any contemplated improvement to be constructed anywhere within the common interest community. Any contemplated improvement shown shall be labeled either “must be built” or “need not be built.”

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h) of this section, to the extent not shown or projected on the plats, plans of the units shall show or project:

the approximate location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit and that unit’s identifying number;

the approximate location of any horizontal unit boundaries with reference to an established datum and that unit’s identifying number; and

the approximate location of any units in which the declarant has reserved the right to create additional units or common elements pursuant to subsection 2-111(3) of this title, identified appropriately.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the horizontal boundaries of part of a unit located outside a building which have the same elevation as the horizontal boundaries of the inside part need not be depicted on the plats and plans.

Upon exercising any development right, the declarant shall record either new plats and plans necessary to conform to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), and (d) of this section or new certifications of plats and plans previously recorded if those plats and plans otherwise conform to the requirements of those subsections.

Any certification of a plat or plan required by this section shall be made by an independent professional surveyor, architect, or engineer, as appropriate and if authorized by the respective practice acts of each profession in 26 V.S.A. chapters 3, 20, and 45.

Plats and plans need not show the location and dimensions of the units’ boundaries or their limited common elements if:

the plat shows the location and dimensions of all buildings containing or comprising the units; and

the declaration includes other information that shows or contains a narrative description of the general layout of the units in those buildings and the limited common elements allocated to those units.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.